North Carolina, session 2025, SB991.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. NCCCS IDD WORKFORCE TRAINING EXPANSION
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115D-10.21(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) The State Board of Community Colleges shall establish a community college training
program for up to 15 25 community colleges. The program shall provide opportunities for
micro-credentials or other credentials that lead to increased employment outcomes for
individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities (IDD). To the extent funds are
appropriated for this purpose, the program shall improve the ability of participating community
colleges to offer training and educational components that include improving employability skills
and providing on-the-job training and apprenticeships with business and industry for individuals
with IDD. The goal of the program shall be to inform community colleges and address
cross-departmental supports within the individual community colleges on programs for
individuals with IDD related to at least the following:
(1) Establishing best practices for providing vocational training for individuals
with IDD.
(2) Providing financial and benefits counseling.
(3) Developing strategies on integrating assistive technology.
(4) Maximizing access, with supports, to credential and degree programs,
including micro-credentials that are established by the State Board.
(5) Identifying methods to increase orientation and integration of individuals with
IDD into the college community to the greatest extent possible.
(6) Determining a needs assessment, marketing, and evaluation to serve a broad
array of individuals with developmental and other similar disabilities or
learning challenges to assure adequate demand for new or existing programs."
SECTION 1.(b) Of the funds appropriated for North Carolina Community Colleges
System IDD Workforce Training Expansion in this section, the Community Colleges System
Office shall use the funds as follows:
(1) The sum of six hundred forty thousand dollars ($640,000) in recurring funds
shall be used to create two positions to facilitate the creation of work-based
learning opportunities and be dedicated to engagement with business and
industry partners statewide. These funds shall also be used for the expansion
*S991-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
of Career and College Promise high school pathways and pre-apprenticeships
and work-based learning for individuals with intellectual and developmental
disabilities.
(2) The sum of eight hundred ten thousand dollars ($810,000) in recurring funds
may be used for marketing evaluation, online resources, professional
development, and infrastructure support.
(3) The remaining funds shall be used to expand the program developed pursuant
to G.S. 115D-10.21, as amended by this section.
SECTION 1.(c) The Community Colleges System Office shall continue to provide
funds to community colleges participating in the program developed pursuant to
G.S. 115D-10.21, as amended by this section, at the rate of one hundred ninety-four thousand
dollars ($194,000) per participating community college.
SECTION 1.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of three million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars
($3,850,000) in recurring funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to implement the
provisions of this section.

PART II. EXPEDITED TEACHER PIPELINE PATHWAY STUDY
SECTION 2. No later than March 15, 2027, ApprenticeshipNC shall report to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on a plan to facilitate one or more expedited
pathways for apprenticeship candidates to enter the teaching profession. ApprenticeshipNC shall
develop the plan in collaboration with the Board of Governors of The University of North
Carolina, the State Board of Community Colleges, the Department of Public Instruction, and
Teach NC. In addition, ApprenticeshipNC may, in its discretion, collaborate with representatives
of approved educator preparation programs, local school administrative units, and existing
apprenticeship programs. The plan shall include at least the following components:
(1) Options for an accelerated transition pathway that allows high school students
to earn college credits leading to a teaching license while participating in
structured, paid, or other experiential learning in the classroom, including
applicable program design and sequencing components needed to achieve that
goal.
(2) Maximize usage and transferability of at least the following coursework
completion opportunities:
a. College transfer pathways provided through the Career and College
Promise Program that support entry into a recognized educator
preparation program.
b. Community college coursework leading to completion of an associate
degree related to teacher preparation.
c. Online or asynchronous coursework provided at a constituent
institution of The University of North Carolina leading to a bachelor's
degree.
d. Enrollment in an associate degree program or a bachelor's degree
program while serving (i) as a full-time employee in a public school
unit and (ii) as a teacher assistant or apprentice.
(3) Any legislative changes or appropriations needed to implement the plan.

PART III. DIGITAL WALLET EXPANSION
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office (System Office) the sum of four million nine hundred thirteen thousand
one hundred dollars ($4,913,100) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used
to expand access to digital credentials in all community colleges in the State. Funds appropriated
Page 2 Senate Bill 991-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
in this section shall be used (i) to select a single CrMS vendor consistent with the requirements
of subsection (b) of this section and (ii) to pay for deployment costs and other costs associated
with implementing the CrMS, including developing and supporting digital infrastructure to be
used by the vendor and community colleges. Funds appropriated in this section shall not revert
but shall remain available until the end of the 2027-2028 fiscal year.
SECTION 3.(b) Funds appropriated in this section shall be used to contract with a
vendor to provide a Credential Management System (CrMS) that meets the following criteria:
(1) Provides the capability to issue, manage, and verify digital credentials across
multiple widely adopted open standards, including World Wide Web
Consortium (W3C) Verifiable Credentials, OpenBadges, and AnonCreds,
within a single platform.
(2) Supports secure, persistent communication channels that enable
authenticated, peer-to-peer interactions between parties.
(3) Meets or exceeds National Institute of Standards and Technology (NIST)
Identity Assurance Level (IAL) 3 standards for identity proofing to ensure
high-confidence identity verification.
(4) Is designed as a decentralized deployment operating as a network appliance
within the State's controlled cloud environment rather than as a multi-tenant
Software as a Service (SaaS) offering in order to ensure data sovereignty,
reduce long-term operational costs, and eliminate dependency on third-party
hosted infrastructure.
(5) Includes a noncustodial mobile digital wallet that enables individuals to
maintain sole control of their credentials.
(6) Includes configurable, standards-based workflows that extend agency
processes directly to credential holders.
(7) Incorporates advanced capabilities for workforce matching, including
artificial intelligence driven analysis that aligns verified credentials with
employment opportunities.
(8) Includes trust and verification systems anchored using blockchain-based
mechanisms solely for publishing tamper-resistant public keys and service
endpoints, without storing any personally identifiable information or
credential data on-chain.

PART IV. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Senate Bill 991-First Edition Page 3